District of Columbia statutes.
2-360.05

Appeal of Board decisions.

(a)

A contractor may appeal a Board decision to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals within 120 days after the date of receipt of a copy of the decision.

(b)

If the CPO determines that an appeal should be taken, the CPO, with the prior approval of the Office of the Attorney General, may appeal the Board’s decision to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals for judicial review within 120 days from the date of the receipt of the Board’s decision.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1005, 58 DCR 1185

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-360.07.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 2-309.05.